Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-3501
Community Improvement District Act, how cited.

Sections 18-3501 to 18-3559 shall be known and may be cited as the Community Improvement District Act.

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 1.
April 17, 2026